Missouri, session 2026, HB2286.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 1, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 1.206, to read as follows:
1.206. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Body of water", any natural or man-made accumulation of water,
regardless of whether the accumulation of water is static or subject to a force that causes
a hydrological current;
(2) "Governmental entity", a court, the general assembly, the legislative body of
a political subdivision, or another entity of the state or a political subdivision if the
entity has adjudicatory or rulemaking authority;
(3) "Human being", a member of the species classified as homo sapiens;
(4) "Land", the solid terrestrial surface or subsurface of the Earth;
(5) "Legal personhood", the legal rights and obligations of an individual under
the laws of this state or the legal rights and obligations of a person other than an
individual under the laws of this state;
(6) "Political subdivision", the same as under section 67.750;
(7) "Real property", any building, fixture, improvement, appurtenance,
structure, or other development that is affixed permanently to land;
(8) "State", the same as under section 1.020.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a governmental
entity shall not grant legal personhood to, nor recognize legal personhood in:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2286 2
(1) Artificial intelligence;
(2) An inanimate object;
(3) A body of water;
(4) Land;
(5) Real property;
(6) Atmospheric gases;
(7) An astronomical object;
(8) Weather;
(9) A plant;
(10) A nonhuman animal; or
(11) Any member of a taxonomic species that is not a human being.
✔